Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article X. Taxation and Finance.
§ 8. Limit of tax or revenue; Revenue Stabilization Fund.

No other or greater amount of tax or revenues shall, at any time, be levied than may be required for the necessary expenses of the government, or to pay the indebtedness of the Commonwealth.

The General Assembly shall establish the Revenue Stabilization Fund.
The Fund shall consist of an amount not to exceed fifteen percent of the Commonwealth’s average annual tax revenues derived from taxes on income and retail sales as certified by the Auditor of Public Accounts for the three fiscal years immediately preceding.
The Auditor of Public Accounts shall compute the fifteen percent limitation of such fund annually and report to the General Assembly not later than the first day of December.
“Certified tax revenues” means the Commonwealth’s annual tax revenues derived from taxes on income and retail sales as certified by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

The General Assembly shall make deposits to the Fund to equal at least fifty percent of the product of the certified tax revenues collected in the most recently ended fiscal year times the difference between the annual percentage increase in the certified tax revenues collected for the most recently ended fiscal year and the average annual percentage increase in the certified tax revenues collected in the six fiscal years immediately preceding the most recently ended fiscal year.
However, growth in certified tax revenues, which is the result of either increases in tax rates on income or retail sales or the repeal of exemptions therefrom, may be excluded, in whole or in part, from the computation immediately preceding for a period of time not to exceed six calendar years from the calendar year in which such tax rate increase or exemption repeal was effective.
Additional appropriations may be made at any time so long as the fifteen percent limitation established herein is not exceeded.
All interest earned on the Fund shall be part thereof; however, if the Fund’s balance exceeds the limitation, the amount in excess of the limitation shall be paid into the general fund after appropriation by the General Assembly.

The General Assembly may appropriate an amount for transfer from the Fund to compensate for no more than one-half of the difference between the total general fund revenues appropriated and a revised general fund revenue forecast presented to the General Assembly prior to or during a subsequent regular or special legislative session. However, no transfer shall be made unless the general fund revenues appropriated exceed such revised general fund revenue forecast by more than two percent of certified tax revenues collected in the most recently ended fiscal year.
Furthermore, no appropriation or transfer from such fund in any fiscal year shall exceed more than one-half of the balance of the Revenue Stabilization Fund.
The General Assembly may enact such laws as may be necessary and appropriate to implement the Fund.

Cross references.

As to the reports of the Auditor of Public Accounts, see §

2.2-1829

.

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 2010. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2009 Session (Acts 2009, c. 774) and was referred to the 2010 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2010, cc. 606, 744, 772, and 774) and submitted to the people November 2, 2010. The amendment, effective January 1, 2011, substituted “fifteen percent” for “ten percent” three times and added “; Revenue Stabilization Fund” to the section heading.

Amendment ratified Nov. 7, 1992. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1991 Session (Acts 1991, c. 642) and was referred to the 1992 Session.
It was again agreed to at the 1992 Session (Acts 1992, cc. 315 and 821) and was ratified by the people November 7, 1992. Acts 1992, c. 315 provided that the amendment would take effect on January 1, 1993. The amendment added the last three paragraphs.

Proposed amendments not agreed to by General Assembly. —

Two identical amendments to this section were proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1981 Session (Acts 1981, cc. 641, 643), and referred to the 1982 Session. At the 1982 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendments.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1983 Session (Acts 1983, c. 623) and referred to the 1984 Session. At the 1984 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 36.

§ 9. State debt.

No debt shall be contracted by or in behalf of the Commonwealth except as provided herein.

Debts to meet emergencies and redeem previous debt obligations.

The General Assembly may (1) contract debts to suppress insurrection, repel invasion, or defend the Commonwealth in time of war; (2) contract debts, or may authorize the Governor to contract debts, to meet casual deficits in the revenue or in anticipation of the collection of revenues of the Commonwealth for the then current fiscal year within the amount of authorized appropriations, provided that the total of such indebtedness shall not exceed thirty per centum of an amount equal to 1.15 times the average annual tax revenues of the Commonwealth derived from taxes on income and retail sales, as certified by the Auditor of Public Accounts, for the preceding fiscal year and that each such debt shall mature within twelve months from the date such debt is incurred; and (3) contract debts to redeem a previous debt obligation of the Commonwealth.

The full faith and credit of the Commonwealth shall be pledged to any debt created under this subsection. The amount of such debt shall not be included in the limitations on debt hereinafter established, except that the amount of debt incurred pursuant to clause (3) above shall be included in determining the limitation on the aggregate amount of general obligation debt for capital projects permitted elsewhere in this Article unless the debt so incurred pursuant to clause (3) above is secured by a pledge of net revenues from capital projects of institutions or agencies administered solely by the executive department of the Commonwealth or of institutions of higher learning of the Commonwealth, which net revenues the Governor shall certify are anticipated to be sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on such debt and to provide such reserves as the law authorizing the same may require, in which event the amount thereof shall be included in determining the limitation on the aggregate amount of debt contained in the provision of this Article which authorizes general obligation debt for certain revenue-producing capital projects.

General obligation debt for capital projects and sinking fund.

The General Assembly may, upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members elected to each house, authorize the creation of debt to which the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth is pledged, for capital projects to be distinctly specified in the law authorizing the same; provided that any such law shall specify capital projects constituting a single purpose and shall not take effect until it shall have been submitted to the people at an election and a majority of those voting on the question shall have approved such debt. No such debt shall be authorized by the General Assembly if the amount thereof when added to amounts approved by the people, or authorized by the General Assembly and not yet submitted to the people for approval, under this subsection during the three fiscal years immediately preceding the authorization by the General Assembly of such debt and the fiscal year in which such debt is authorized shall exceed twenty-five per centum of an amount equal to 1.15 times the average annual tax revenues of the Commonwealth derived from taxes on income and retail sales, as certified by the Auditor of Public Accounts, for the three fiscal years immediately preceding the authorization of such debt by the General Assembly.

No debt shall be incurred under this subsection if the amount thereof when added to the aggregate amount of all outstanding debt to which the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth is pledged other than that excluded from this limitation by the provisions of this Article authorizing the contracting of debts to redeem a previous debt obligation of the Commonwealth and for certain revenue-producing capital projects, less any amounts set aside in sinking funds for the repayment of such outstanding debt, shall exceed an amount equal to 1.15 times the average annual tax revenues of the Commonwealth derived from taxes on income and retail sales, as certified by the Auditor of Public Accounts, for the three fiscal years immediately preceding the incurring of such debt.

All debt incurred under this subsection shall mature within a period not to exceed the estimated useful life of the projects as stated in the authorizing law, which statement shall be conclusive, or a period of thirty years, whichever is shorter; and all debt incurred to redeem a previous debt obligation of the Commonwealth, except that which is secured by net revenues anticipated to be sufficient to pay the same and provide reserves therefor, shall mature within a period not to exceed thirty years. Such debt shall be amortized, by payment into a sinking fund or otherwise, in annual installments of principal to begin not later than one tenth of the term of the bonds, and any such sinking fund shall not be appropriated for any other purpose; if such debt be for public road purposes, such payment shall be first made from revenues segregated by law for the construction and maintenance of State highways. No such installment shall exceed the smallest previous installment by more than one hundred per centum. If sufficient funds are not appropriated in the budget for any fiscal year for the timely payment of the interest upon and installments of principal of such debt, there shall be set apart by direction of the Governor, from the first general fund revenues received during such fiscal year and thereafter, a sum sufficient to pay such interest and installments of principal.

Debt for certain revenue-producing capital projects.

The General Assembly may authorize the creation of debt secured by a pledge of net revenues derived from rates, fees, or other charges and the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth, and such debt shall not be included in determining the limitation on general obligation debt for capital projects as permitted elsewhere in this Article, provided that

the creation of such debt is authorized by the affirmative vote of two thirds of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly; and

such debt is created for specific revenue-producing capital projects (including the enlargement or improvement thereof), which shall be distinctly specified in the law authorizing the same, of institutions and agencies administered solely by the executive department of the Commonwealth or of institutions of higher learning of the Commonwealth.

Before any such debt shall be authorized by the General Assembly, and again before it shall be incurred, the Governor shall certify in writing, filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts, his opinion, based upon responsible engineering and economic estimates, that the anticipated net revenues to be pledged to the payment of principal of and interest on such debt will be sufficient to meet such payments as the same become due and to provide such reserves as the law authorizing such debt may require, and that the projects otherwise comply with the requirements of this subsection, which certifications shall be conclusive.

No debt shall be incurred under this subsection if the amount thereof when added to the aggregate amount of all outstanding debt authorized by this subsection and the amount of all outstanding debt incurred to redeem a previous debt obligation of the Commonwealth which is to be included in the limitation of this subsection by virtue of the provisions of this Article authorizing the contracting of debts to redeem a previous debt obligation of the Commonwealth, less any amounts set aside in sinking funds or the payment of such debt, shall exceed an amount equal to 1.15 times the average annual tax revenues of the Commonwealth derived from taxes on income and retail sales, as certified by the Auditor of Public Accounts, for the three fiscal years immediately preceding the incurring of such debt.

This subsection shall not be construed to pledge the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth to the payment of any obligation of the Commonwealth, or any institution, agency, or authority thereof, or to any refinancing or reissuance of such obligation which was incurred prior to the effective date of this subsection.

Obligations to which section not applicable.

The restrictions of this section shall not apply to any obligation incurred by the Commonwealth or any institution, agency, or authority thereof if the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth is not pledged or committed to the payment of such obligation.

Cross references.

As to the use of bond anticipation notes by the Treasury Board, see §

2.2-2418

.

As to the Governor’s authority to sell debts contracted under this section, either at public or private sale, and for a price as he determines to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth, see §

2.2-4900

.

As to powers of Commonwealth Transportation Board to construct, operate, and maintain state highways, financed in whole or in part through the issuance of bonds, see §

33.2-1701

.

Amendments ratified Nov. 3, 1970. —

The amendment adding subdivision (b) to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1969 extra session (Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 30) and again at the 1970 Session (Acts 1970, cc. 763, 787), and was ratified by the people on Nov. 3, 1970, along with the general revision of the Constitution.

A further amendment, proposed and agreed to in same sessions (Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 31; Acts 1970, cc. 763, 788) and ratified by the people at the same election, added subdivision (c) of this section.

Defeat of proposed amendment. —

An amendment to this section proposed and agreed to by Acts 1989, c. 671, and Acts 1990, cc. 735 and 882, and submitted to the people Nov. 6, 1990, was defeated.

Law Review.

For article, “In Aid of Public Education: An Analysis of the Education Article of the Virginia Constitution of 1971,” see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 263 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3C M.J. Colleges and Universities, § 7;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 6;
5A M.J. Counties, § 74;
17 M.J. State, § 13.

§ 10. Lending of credit, stock subscriptions, and works of internal improvement.

Neither the credit of the Commonwealth nor of any county, city, town, or regional government shall be directly or indirectly, under any device or pretense whatsoever, granted to or in aid of any person, association, or corporation; nor shall the Commonwealth or any such unit of government subscribe to or become interested in the stock or obligations of any company, association, or corporation for the purpose of aiding in the construction or maintenance of its work; nor shall the Commonwealth become a party to or become interested in any work of internal improvement, except public roads and public parks, or engage in carrying on any such work; nor shall the Commonwealth assume any indebtedness of any county, city, town, or regional government, nor lend its credit to the same. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the General Assembly from establishing an authority with power to insure and guarantee loans to finance industrial development and industrial expansion and from making appropriations to such authority.

Cross references.

As to Commonwealth Transportation Board, and highways generally, see § 33.1-2-100 et seq.

As to exemption of assets of the Virginia Retirement System from taxation, see §

51.1-124.4

.

Law Review.

For discussion of this section and State economic policy, see 45 Va. L. Rev. 1418 (1959).

For survey of Virginia law on administrative law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1603 (1970).

For article, “In Aid of Public Education: An Analysis of the Education Article of the Virginia Constitution of 1971,” see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 263 (1971).

For essay, “Modern Transportation Needs and the Prohibitions of Article X, Section 10 of the Virginia Constitution,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
5A M.J. Counties, § 64;
12B M.J. Markets and Marketing, § 5;
13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 31;
16 M.J. Schools, § 28;
17 M.J. State, § 13;
19 M.J. Turnpikes & Tollroads, § 1.

§ 11. Governmental employees retirement system.

The General Assembly shall maintain a retirement system for state employees and employees of participating political subdivisions and school divisions. The funds of the retirement system shall be deemed separate and independent trust funds, shall be segregated from all other funds of the Commonwealth, and shall be invested and administered solely in the interests of the members and beneficiaries thereof. Neither the General Assembly nor any public officer, employee, or agency shall use or authorize the use of such trust funds for any purpose other than as provided in law for benefits, refunds, and administrative expenses, including but not limited to legislative oversight of the retirement system. Such trust funds shall be invested as authorized by law. Retirement system benefits shall be funded using methods which are consistent with generally accepted actuarial principles. The retirement system shall be subject to restrictions, terms, and conditions as may be prescribed by the General Assembly.

Amendment ratified Nov. 5, 1996. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1995 Regular Session (Acts 1995, cc. 704 and 708) and was referred to the 1996 Session. It was again agreed to at that Session (Acts 1996, cc. 4 and 909) and submitted to the people November 5, 1996, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 1997, in the heading of the section, substituted “employees” for “employee” and deleted “fund” following “retirement system,” substituted “retirement system for state employees and employees of participating political subdivisions and school divisions” for “state employees retirement system to be administered in the best interest of the beneficiaries thereof and subject to such restrictions or conditions as may be prescribed by the General Assembly” at the end of the first sentence and added the second through the sixth sentences.